Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0873.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 201. (1) Subject to the conditions set forth in this
article, the amounts listed in this section are appropriated for
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


community colleges for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026,
2027, from the funds indicated in this section. The following is a
summary of the appropriations in this section and section 201f:
(a) The gross appropriation is $493,032,100.00.
$490,763,500.00. After deducting total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers in the amount of $0.00, the adjusted
gross appropriation is $493,032,100.00.$490,763,500.00.
(b) The sources of the adjusted gross appropriation described
in subdivision (a) are as follows:
(i) Total federal revenues, $0.00.
(ii) Total local revenues, $0.00.
(iii) Total private revenues, $0.00.
(iv) Total other state restricted revenues,
$493,032,100.00.$490,763,500.00.
(v) State general fund/general purpose money, $0.00.
(2) Subject to subsection (3), the amount appropriated for
community college operations is $363,570,600.00, $363,594,500.00,
allocated as follows:
(a) The appropriation for Alpena Community College is
$6,416,800.00, $6,403,300.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance
funding, and $13,500.00 for costs incurred under the North American
Indian tuition waiver.$6,431,400.00, $6,403,300.00 for operations,
$0.00 for performance funding, and $28,100.00 for costs incurred
under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(b) The appropriation for Bay de Noc Community College is
$6,390,000.00, $6,298,000.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance
funding, and $92,000.00 for costs incurred under the North American
Indian tuition waiver.$6,410,300.00, $6,298,000.00 for operations,
$0.00 for performance funding, and $112,300.00 for costs incurred
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(c) The appropriation for Delta College is $16,934,200.00,
$16,882,400.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and
$51,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian
tuition waiver.$16,928,400.00, $16,882,400.00 for operations, $0.00
for performance funding, and $46,000.00 for costs incurred under
the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(d) The appropriation for Glen Oaks Community College is
$2,987,000.00, $2,984,100.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance
funding, and $2,900.00 for costs incurred under the North American
Indian tuition waiver.$2,984,500.00, $2,984,100.00 for operations,
$0.00 for performance funding, and $400.00 for costs incurred under
the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(e) The appropriation for Gogebic Community College is
$5,439,100.00, $5,399,000.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance
funding, and $40,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American
Indian tuition waiver.$5,417,900.00, $5,399,000.00 for operations,
$0.00 for performance funding, and $18,900.00 for costs incurred
under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(f) The appropriation for Grand Rapids Community College is
$21,337,300.00, $21,184,200.00 for operations, $0.00 for
performance funding, and $153,100.00 for costs incurred under the
North American Indian tuition waiver.$21,387,200.00, $21,184,200.00
for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $203,000.00 for
costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(g) The appropriation for Henry Ford College is
$25,305,200.00, $25,300,700.00 for operations, $0.00 for
performance funding, and $4,500.00 for costs incurred under the
North American Indian tuition waiver.$25,308,100.00, $25,300,700.00
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $7,400.00 for
costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(h) The appropriation for Jackson College is $14,059,700.00,
$14,032,600.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and
$27,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian
tuition waiver.$14,054,800.00, $14,032,600.00 for operations, $0.00
for performance funding, and $22,200.00 for costs incurred under
the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(i) The appropriation for Kalamazoo Valley Community College
is $14,751,300.00, $14,704,400.00 for operations, $0.00 for
performance funding, and $46,900.00 for costs incurred under the
North American Indian tuition waiver.$14,744,600.00, $14,704,400.00
for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $40,200.00 for
costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(j) The appropriation for Kellogg Community College is
$11,453,400.00, $11,426,700.00 for operations, $0.00 for
performance funding, and $26,700.00 for costs incurred under the
North American Indian tuition waiver.$11,470,000.00, $11,426,700.00
for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $43,300.00 for
costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(k) The appropriation for Kirtland Community College is
$3,881,400.00, $3,835,100.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance
funding, and $46,300.00 for costs incurred under the North American
Indian tuition waiver.$3,881,400.00, $3,835,100.00 for operations,
$0.00 for performance funding, and $46,300.00 for costs incurred
under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(l) The appropriation for Lake Michigan College is
$6,427,600.00, $6,408,200.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance
funding, and $19,400.00 for costs incurred under the North American
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


Indian tuition waiver.$6,417,300.00, $6,408,200.00 for operations,
$0.00 for performance funding, and $9,100.00 for costs incurred
under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(m) The appropriation for Lansing Community College is
$36,216,500.00, $36,134,400.00 for operations, $0.00 for
performance funding, and $82,100.00 for costs incurred under the
North American Indian tuition waiver.$36,206,200.00, $36,134,400.00
for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $71,800.00 for
costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(n) The appropriation for Macomb Community College is
$38,251,500.00, $38,160,600.00 for operations, $0.00 for
performance funding, and $90,900.00 for costs incurred under the
North American Indian tuition waiver.$38,187,600.00, $38,160,600.00
for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $27,000.00 for
costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(o) The appropriation for Mid Michigan Community College is
$5,919,500.00, $5,837,000.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance
funding, and $82,500.00 for costs incurred under the North American
Indian tuition waiver.$5,921,400.00, $5,837,000.00 for operations,
$0.00 for performance funding, and $84,400.00 for costs incurred
under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(p) The appropriation for Monroe County Community College is
$5,368,900.00, $5,368,500.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance
funding, and $400.00 for costs incurred under the North American
Indian tuition waiver.$5,371,200.00, $5,368,500.00 for operations,
$0.00 for performance funding, and $2,700.00 for costs incurred
under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(q) The appropriation for Montcalm Community College is
$4,035,000.00, $4,033,300.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


funding, and $1,700.00 for costs incurred under the North American
Indian tuition waiver.$4,042,800.00, $4,033,300.00 for operations,
$0.00 for performance funding, and $9,500.00 for costs incurred
under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(r) The appropriation for C.S. Mott Community College is
$18,028,100.00, $18,017,800.00 for operations, $0.00 for
performance funding, and $10,300.00 for costs incurred under the
North American Indian tuition waiver.$18,032,100.00, $18,017,800.00
for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $14,300.00 for
costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(s) The appropriation for Muskegon Community College is
$10,403,400.00, $10,359,900.00 for operations, $0.00 for
performance funding, and $43,500.00 for costs incurred under the
North American Indian tuition waiver.$10,412,100.00, $10,359,900.00
for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $52,200.00 for
costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(t) The appropriation for North Central Michigan College is
$4,110,100.00, $3,947,700.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance
funding, and $162,400.00 for costs incurred under the North
American Indian tuition waiver.$4,110,600.00, $3,947,700.00 for
operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $162,900.00 for
costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(u) The appropriation for Northwestern Michigan College is
$10,874,500.00, $10,619,800.00 for operations, $0.00 for
performance funding, and $254,700.00 for costs incurred under the
North American Indian tuition waiver.$10,885,800.00, $10,619,800.00
for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $266,000.00 for
costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(v) The appropriation for Oakland Community College is
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


$25,168,400.00, $25,130,000.00 for operations, $0.00 for
performance funding, and $38,400.00 for costs incurred under the
North American Indian tuition waiver.$25,166,900.00, $25,130,000.00
for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $36,900.00 for
costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(w) The appropriation for Schoolcraft College is
$14,997,300.00, $14,972,000.00 for operations, $0.00 for
performance funding, and $25,300.00 for costs incurred under the
North American Indian tuition waiver.$14,989,100.00, $14,972,000.00
for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $17,100.00 for
costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(x) The appropriation for Southwestern Michigan College is
$7,805,700.00, $7,786,600.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance
funding, and $19,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American
Indian tuition waiver.$7,803,100.00, $7,786,600.00 for operations,
$0.00 for performance funding, and $16,500.00 for costs incurred
under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(y) The appropriation for St. Clair County Community College
is $8,355,300.00, $8,342,000.00 for operations, $0.00 for
performance funding, and $13,300.00 for costs incurred under the
North American Indian tuition waiver.$8,351,300.00, $8,342,000.00
for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $9,300.00 for
costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(z) The appropriation for Washtenaw Community College is
$16,276,300.00, $16,257,300.00 for operations, $0.00 for
performance funding, and $19,000.00 for costs incurred under the
North American Indian tuition waiver.$16,289,700.00, $16,257,300.00
for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $32,400.00 for
costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


(aa) The appropriation for Wayne County Community College is
$19,462,800.00, $19,460,300.00 for operations, $0.00 for
performance funding, and $2,500.00 for costs incurred under the
North American Indian tuition waiver.$19,464,000.00, $19,460,300.00
for operations, $0.00 for performance funding, and $3,700.00 for
costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(bb) The appropriation for West Shore Community College is
$2,914,300.00, $2,896,700.00 for operations, $0.00 for performance
funding, and $17,600.00 for costs incurred under the North American
Indian tuition waiver.$2,924,700.00, $2,896,700.00 for operations,
$0.00 for performance funding, and $28,000.00 for costs incurred
under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(3) The amount appropriated in subsection (2) for community
college operations is $363,570,600.00 $363,594,500.00 and is
appropriated from the state school aid fund.
(4) From the appropriations described in subsection (1), both
of the following apply:
(a) Subject to section 207a, the amount appropriated for
fiscal year 2025-2026 2026-2027 to offset certain fiscal year 2025-
2026 2026-2027 retirement contributions is $7,189,000.00,
appropriated from the state school aid fund.
(b) For fiscal year 2025-2026, 2026-2027, there is allocated
an amount not to exceed $19,600,000.00 $18,350,000.00 for payments
to participating community colleges, appropriated from the state
school aid fund. A community college that receives money under this
subdivision shall use that money solely for the purpose of
offsetting the normal cost contribution rate.
(5) From the appropriations described in subsection (1),
subject to section 207b, the amount appropriated for payments to
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


community colleges that are participating entities of the
retirement system is $89,500,000.00, $84,800,000.00, appropriated
from the state school aid fund.
(6) From the appropriations described in subsection (1),
subject to section 207c, the amount appropriated for renaissance
zone tax reimbursements is $2,200,000.00, appropriated from the
state school aid fund. Each community college receiving funds in
this subsection shall accrue these payments to its institutional
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.2027.
Sec. 201f. For fiscal year 2025-2026 2026-2027 only, from the
appropriations described in section 201(1), $10,972,500.00
$14,630,000.00 is appropriated from the state school aid fund for a
1-time performance funding payment. Funds appropriated under this
section, subject to conditions described in sections 217b and 230,
must be distributed as follows:
(a) Alpena Community College, $271,100.00.$233,300.00.
(b) Bay de Noc Community College, $178,200.00.$234,700.00.
(c) Delta College, $493,300.00.$644,400.00.
(d) Glen Oaks Community College, $91,200.00.$132,700.00.
(e) Gogebic Community College, $139,500.00.$212,000.00.
(f) Grand Rapids Community College, $685,500.00.$902,800.00.
(g) Henry Ford College, $750,900.00.$990,300.00.
(h) Jackson College, $364,800.00.$513,000.00.
(i) Kalamazoo Valley Community College,
$433,700.00.$615,100.00.
(j) Kellogg Community College, $324,400.00.$433,800.00.
(k) Kirtland Community College, $146,500.00.$212,400.00.
(l) Lake Michigan College, $192,200.00.$284,000.00.
(m) Lansing Community College, $924,700.00.$1,189,000.00.
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


(n) Macomb Community College, $1,090,600.00.$1,450,400.00.
(o) Mid Michigan Community College, $193,900.00.$254,500.00.
(p) Monroe County Community College, $206,600.00.$230,100.00.
(q) Montcalm Community College, $122,300.00.$162,700.00.
(r) C.S. Mott Community College, $491,700.00.$658,400.00.
(s) Muskegon Community College, $298,600.00.$394,200.00.
(t) North Central Michigan College, $144,300.00.$217,800.00.
(u) Northwestern Michigan College, $289,400.00.$387,800.00.
(v) Oakland Community College, $816,500.00.$1,146,800.00.
(w) Schoolcraft College, $503,200.00.$684,300.00.
(x) Southwestern Michigan College, $210,400.00.$276,800.00.
(y) St. Clair County Community College,
$258,200.00.$360,200.00.
(z) Washtenaw Community College, $664,900.00.$881,100.00.
(aa) Wayne County Community College, $600,900.00.$792,600.00.
(bb) West Shore Community College, $85,000.00.$134,800.00.
Sec. 201i. (1) Not later than Within 30 days after of the
enactment of the an amendatory act that added this section, to this
article, the legislature house and senate shall provide to the
responsible entity and the state budget director office a jointly
agreed upon list of legislatively directed spending items, which
may be referred to in this section as grants or direct
appropriation grants, funded under the amendatory act that added
this section consistent with house or senate rules and this
section. funded by the amendatory act. The list must include all
information and documents pertaining to the funded items as
publicly disclosed in accordance with house or senate rules and
this section.sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget
act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. As used in this
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


subsection, "legislatively directed spending item" means that term
as defined in section 364 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA
431, MCL 18.1364.
(2) Notwithstanding any other conditions or requirements for
direct appropriation grants, the responsible entity shall perform,
at a minimum, at least all of the following activities to
administer the grants described in subsection (1):
(a) Establish a process to review, complete, and execute a
grant agreement with a grant recipient. The responsible entity
shall not execute a grant agreement unless all necessary
documentation has been submitted and reviewed.
(b) Verify to the extent possible that a grant recipient is a
not-for-profit entity and will use funds as publicly disclosed and
for a public purpose that serves the economic prosperity, health,
safety, or general welfare of the residents of this state.
(c) Review and verify all necessary information to ensure the
grant recipient is reasonably able to execute the grant agreement,
perform its fiduciary duty, and comply with all applicable state
and federal statutes. The responsible entity may deduct the cost of
background checks and any other efforts performed as part of this
verification from the amount of the designated grant award.
(d) Disburse the grant money per the grant disbursement
schedule in the executed grant agreement on a reimbursement basis
after the grantee has provided sufficient documentation, as
determined by the responsible entity, to verify that expenditures
were made in accordance with the project purpose.
(e) If the state budget director determines that information
provided by the grantee does not meet the disclosure requirements,
that the grant will be used to pay a tax lien, delinquent tax, or
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


other obligation owed to this state, or that the grant will create
a conflict of interest, the responsible entity shall not release
the grant money to the grantee. Money that is not released under
this subdivision lapses at the end of the fiscal year. There is not
a conflict of interest if the sponsoring legislator certifies that
the sponsoring legislator's immediate family members, legislative
staff members that have worked for the sponsoring legislator within
the past 2 years, and the sponsoring legislator do not have a
direct or indirect pecuniary interest in the legislatively directed
spending item.
(3) An executed grant agreement under this section between the
responsible entity and a grant recipient must include at least all
of the following:
(a) All necessary identifying information for the grant
recipient, including any tax and financial information necessary
for the responsible entity to administer grant money under this
section.
(b) A description of the project for which the grant money
will be expended, including tentative timelines and the estimated
budget. Project budget must include how all grant money will be
used and must indicate if any grant money will be provided to a
third party or subrecipient. The responsible entity shall not
reimburse expenditures that are outside of the project purpose, as
stated in the executed grant agreement, from appropriations under
the amendatory act that added this section. The grantee shall
return to the state treasury any interest in excess of $1,000.00
earned on the grant money while unexpended and in possession of the
grantee.
(c) Unless otherwise specified in the responsible entity's
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


policy, a requirement that funds appropriated for the grants
described in subsection (1) may be used only for expenditures that
occur on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that
added this section.
(d) A requirement for reporting by the grant recipient to the
responsible entity and the legislative sponsor that provides the
status of the project and an accounting of all money expended by
the grant recipient, as determined by the responsible entity.
(e) A clawback provision that allows the department of
treasury to recoup or otherwise collect any grant money that is
declined, unspent, or otherwise misused.
(f) The documents publicly disclosed under subsection (1).
(4) If appropriate to improve the administration or oversight
of a grant described in subsection (1), the responsible entity may
adopt a memorandum of understanding with another state department
to perform the required duties under this section.
(5) A grant recipient shall respond to all reasonable
information requests from the responsible entity related to grant
expenditures and retain grant records for not less than 7 years,
and the grant may be subject to monitoring, site visits, and audit
as determined by the responsible entity. The grant agreement
required under this section must include signed assurance by the
chief executive officer or other executive officer of the grant
recipient authorized to bind the grant recipient that the
requirements of this subsection will be met.
(6) The grant recipient shall expend all grant money awarded
and complete all projects not later than September 30, 2030. If at
that time any unexpended money remains, the grant recipient shall
return that money to the state treasury. If a grant recipient does
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


not provide information sufficient to execute a grant agreement not
later than June 1, 2026, the responsible entity shall return money
associated with the grant to the state treasury.
(7) Any grant money that is awarded to a responsible entity is
appropriated in that responsible entity for the purpose of the
intended grant.
(2) (8) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (9),
beginning March 15 of the current fiscal year, the responsible
entity In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency
administering the grant described in subsection (1) shall post a
report in a publicly accessible location on its website beginning
March 15 of the current fiscal year. The report must list the grant
recipient, project purpose, and location of the project for each
grant described in subsection (1), the status of money allocated
and disbursed under the grant agreement, and the legislative
sponsor, if applicable. The responsible entity The department or
agency shall update the report and shall post the an updated report
in a publicly accessible location on its website not later than
June 15 of the current fiscal year and again not later than
September 15 of the current fiscal year. The responsible entity
department or agency shall include in the report the most
comprehensive information the responsible entity department or
agency has available at the time of posting for grants awarded.
(9) If the state budget office determines that it is more
efficient for the state budget office to compile all affected
responsible entities' information and post a report of the compiled
information rather than the report required under subsection (8)
being posted by individual responsible entities, the state budget
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


office may compile that information across all affected responsible
entities and other state departments and post the compiled report
and any updates on the same time schedule as identified in
subsection (8).
(10) If the responsible entity reasonably determines that the
money allocated for an executed grant agreement under this section
was misused or that use of the money was misrepresented by the
grant recipient, the responsible entity shall not award any
additional funds under the executed grant agreement and shall refer
the grant for review following internal audit protocols, which may
include referral for criminal investigation.
(11) As used in this section, "responsible entity" means the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, a
community college, or other person that administers a grant under
this article.
Sec. 206. (1) Except for the funds appropriated in section
201(4)(b), the funds appropriated in section sections 201 and 201f
are appropriated for community colleges with fiscal years ending
June 30, 2026 2027 and must be paid out of the state treasury and
distributed by the state treasurer to the respective community
colleges in 11 monthly installments on the sixteenth of each month,
or the next succeeding business day, beginning with October 16,
2025. 2026. Each community college shall accrue its July and August
2026 2027 payments to its institutional fiscal year ending June 30,
2026.2027.
(2) The funds appropriated in section 201(4)(b) are
appropriated for community colleges with fiscal years ending June
30, 2026 2027 and must be distributed to the respective community
colleges in quarterly installments on the sixteenth of each
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


November, February, May, and August. Each community college shall
accrue its August 2026 2027 payments to its institutional fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026.2027.
Sec. 207c. All of the following apply to the allocation of the
appropriations described in section 201(6) to community colleges
described in section 12(3) of the Michigan renaissance zone act,
1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2692:
(a) The amount allocated to each community college under
section 201(6) for fiscal year 2025-2026 2026-2027 must be based on
that community college's proportion of total revenue lost by
community colleges as a result of the exemption of property taxes
levied in 2025 2026 under the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996
PA 376, MCL 125.2681 to 125.2696.
(b) The appropriations described in section 201(6) must be
made to each eligible community college within 60 days after the
department of treasury certifies to the state budget director that
it has received all necessary information to properly determine the
amounts payable to each eligible community college under section 12
of the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2692.
Sec. 212. Community college districts are encouraged to
evaluate and pursue efficiency and cost-containment measures that
maximize state funding. Community colleges shall identify practices
that increase efficiencies, including, but not limited to,
establishing joint ventures, consolidating services, utilizing
program collaborations, maximizing educational benefits through
optimal class sizes and frequency of course offerings, increasing
web-based instruction, eliminating low-enrollment and high-cost
instructional programs, using self-insurance, practicing energy
conservation, and utilizing group purchasing. Community colleges
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


shall also review proposed capital outlay projects to increase
coordination and utilization of new facilities, renovation
projects, and technology improvements.
Sec. 216e. (1) Payments under section 201 201f for 1-time
performance funding must be made only to a community college that
certifies to the state budget director by the last business day of
August each year that it complies with the following:
(a) The institutional best practice described in subdivision
(c).
(b) One or more of the institutional best practices described
in subdivisions (d) to (g).
(a) (c) The community college accepts the Michigan Transfer
Agreement, partners with the Michigan Transfer Network, and
promotes clear transfer pathways for interested students by doing
all of the following:
(i) Has a policy to help transfer or accept associate degrees
from other accredited Michigan postsecondary education
institutions.
(ii) Publishes the policy described in subparagraph (i) on the
institution's website in an easily accessible way and in admissions
materials.
(iii) Provides publicly available information on the Michigan
Transfer Network, applicable transfer pathways, and financial aid
available to transfer students, at no cost to the student.
(iv) Begins negotiations to increase the number of reverse
transfer agreements or articulation agreements and reports on the
progress toward completing the agreements to the state budget
director by the last business day in February.
(b) (d) The community college requires all students to receive
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


an academic degree or certificate map that outlines required course
sequencing, program and institution requirements, declared minor
program academic requirements, and a recommended timeline within
which courses should be taken and in which specific semester or
term in order to satisfy all program requirements to allow the
student to graduate on time.
(c) (e) The community college provides non-credit-bearing
developmental or remedial courses at a reduced cost to students.
(d) (f) The community college provides each degree- or
certificate-seeking student with a designated, trained academic
advisor to support student retention, persistence, and completion.
The community college shall require students to meet with their
academic advisor at least once per semester or term.
(e) (g) The community college provides employees during
business hours to assist prospective and current students in
completing the Free Application for Federal Student Aid.
(f) The community college has adopted a corequisite model of
academic support for gateway English and mathematics courses in
which a student concurrently enrolls in a developmental education
course and a gateway-level course in a subject area where the
student requires remediation. The community college shall ensure
that not more than 10% of students assessed as being in need of
developmental or remedial learning participate in a non-corequisite
developmental or remedial course.
(g) The community college has a policy and process for
assessing prior learning and knowledge that aligns with a student's
academic program and other required coursework. The policy must
include the opportunity for a student to earn credit toward a
degree or certificate, must be available to all students at no cost
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


to the student, and must be easily accessible on the community
college's website and in admissions materials.
(2) The state budget director of the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential, or the director's designee,
shall implement uniform reporting requirements to ensure that a
community college receiving a payment under section 201 for
performance funding has satisfied the institutional best practices
requirements of this section. The state budget director of the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, or
the director's designee, has the sole authority to determine if a
community college has met the requirements of this section.
Information reported by a community college to the state budget
director of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential, or the director's designee, under this subsection must
also be reported to the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on higher education and the house and senate fiscal
agencies.
(3) If a community college fails to comply with the
certification requirements of this section, the state treasurer may
withhold the monthly installments under section 206 to the
community college until the certification is completed. If a
community college does not comply with the certification
requirements described in this section by the end of the fiscal
year, the community college forfeits the amount withheld. Forfeited
funds must lapse to the state school aid fund. The state budget
director of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential, or the director's designee, shall notify the chairs of
the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on higher
education at least 10 days before withholding funds from any
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


community college.
(4) No later than the last business day of November of each
year, each community college that receives a payment under section
201f shall provide a report to the director of the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential, or the director's
designee, that includes the following information for the prior
academic year:
(a) College persistence for on-time completion, defined by 30
credits completed for every 12 consecutive months of enrollment for
certificate or degree-seeking students.
(b) College completion, defined by certificate or degree
conferral.
Sec. 217a. (1) Each community college that receives an
appropriation in section sections 201 and 201f shall submit all of
the following information in the form and manner specified by the
center:
(a) The Michigan community colleges verified data inventory
data for the preceding academic year to the center by the first
business day of November of each year as specified in section 217.
(b) Tuition and mandatory fees information as specified in
section 217b.
(c) The longitudinal data set to the center as specified in
section 219.
(d) The number and type of associate degrees, baccalaureate
degrees, and other certificates awarded as specified in section
219.
(e) The annual independent audit as specified in section 222.
(f) The community college's certification of its compliance
with the requirements described in subsections (4) to (7).
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


(2) If the state budget director determines that a community
college failed to submit any of the information described in
subsection (1) in the form and manner specified by the center, the
state treasurer budget director may withhold the monthly state
operations installments described in section sections 201 and 201f
from that community college until those data are submitted. If a
community college does not submit any of the information described
in subsection (1) by the end of the fiscal year, the community
college forfeits any withheld amount. The state budget director
shall notify the chairs of the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on community colleges at least 10 days before
withholding funds from any community college.
(3) It is intended that accountability reporting for community
colleges will be streamlined through the center. The state budget
director and the center shall work to combine the reporting
requirements outlined in this subsection with the existing Michigan
community colleges verified data inventory collection cycle. All of
the following must be reported to the house and senate fiscal
agencies and the state budget director:
(a) Each community college's certification of its compliance
with the requirements described in subsections (4) and (5).
(b) The reporting and certification requirements of
subsections (6) and (7) and section 217b.
(4) No later than the last first business day of November of
each year, each community college that receives an appropriation in
section 201 shall make all of the information described in
subdivisions (a) to (g) available through a link on its website
homepage, subject to subdivision (h), as follows:
(a) The annual operating budget and subsequent budget
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


revisions.
(b) A link to the most recent "Michigan Community College Data
Inventory Report".
(c) General fund revenue and expenditure projections for the
current fiscal year and the next fiscal year.
(d) A listing of all debt service obligations, detailed by
project, anticipated payment of each project, and total outstanding
debt for the current fiscal year.
(e) Links to all of the following for the community college:
(i) The current collective bargaining agreement for each
bargaining unit.
(ii) Each health care benefits plan, including, but not limited
to, medical, dental, vision, disability, long-term care, or any
other type of benefits that would constitute health care services,
offered to any bargaining unit or employee of the community
college.
(iii) Audits and financial reports for the most recent fiscal
year for which they are available.
(iv) A copy of the board of trustees resolution regarding
compliance with best practices for the local strategic value
component described in section 230(2).
(f) A map that includes the boundaries of the community
college district.
(g) A prominent link to the financial aid website created
under section 260.
(h) For statewide consistency and public visibility, community
colleges shall use the icon badge provided by the department of
technology, management, and budget consistent with the icon badge
developed by the department of education for K-12 school districts.
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


It must appear on the front of each community college's homepage.
The size of the icon may be reduced to 150 x 150 pixels.
(i) A list of severance payments and the amounts of those
severance payments made to former employees of the community
college.
(5) No later than the last first business day of November of
each year, each community college that receives an appropriation in
section 201 shall develop, maintain, and update a "campus safety
information and resources" link, prominently displayed on the
homepage of its website, that links to a section of the community
college's website containing, at a minimum, all of the following
information:
(a) Emergency contact numbers for police, fire, health, and
other services.
(b) Hours, locations, telephone numbers, and email contacts
for campus public safety offices and title IX offices.
(c) A list of safety and security services provided by the
community college, including transportation, escort services,
building surveillance, anonymous tip lines, and other available
security services.
(d) The community college's policies applicable to minors on
community college property.
(e) A directory of resources available at the community
college or in the surrounding community for students or employees
who are survivors of sexual assault or sexual abuse.
(f) An electronic copy of "A Resource Handbook for Campus
Sexual Assault Survivors, Friends and Family", published in 2018.
(g) Campus security policies and crime statistics pursuant to
the student right-to-know and campus security act, Public Law 101-
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


542, 104 Stat 2381. Information must include all material prepared
pursuant to the public information reporting requirements under the
crime awareness and campus security act of 1990, title II of the
student right-to-know and campus security act, Public Law 101-542,
104 Stat 2381.
(6) No later than the last first business day of November of
each year, each community college that receives an appropriation in
section 201 shall report to the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on community colleges, the house and senate fiscal
agencies, and the state budget director its annual title IX report,
also known as the student sexual misconduct report, issued by the
title IX coordinator, as required under the federal campus SaVE act
of 2013, Public Law 113-4, section 304, 127 Stat 54, 89-92 (2013).
(7) No later than the last first business day of November of
each year, each community college that receives an appropriation in
section 201 shall certify that the community college complies with
federal regulations under title IX, as required by the United
States Department of Education, including, but not limited to, the
following:
(a) Use of medical experts that do not have an actual or
apparent conflict of interest.
(b) Issuance of title IX reports to complainants and
respondents that are not divergent.
(c) Notification of resources to each individual who reports
having experienced sexual assault by a member of the community
college.
Sec. 217b. (1) Each community college that receives an
appropriation in section 201 shall report to the center by the last
business day of August of each year the tuition and mandatory fees
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


paid by a full-time in-district student and a full-time out-of-
district student as established by the community college governing
board for the current academic year. This report should also
include the annual cost of tuition and fees based on a full-time
course load of 30 credits. This report must also specify the amount
that tuition and fees have increased for the community college from
the prior academic year. Each community college shall also report
any revisions to the reported current academic year tuition and
mandatory fees adopted by the community college governing board to
the center within 15 days of being adopted. The center shall
provide this information and any revisions to the house and senate
fiscal agencies and the state budget director.
(2) Each community college that receives an appropriation in
section 201 shall certify to the state budget director by the first
last business day of November August of each year that its board
will not adopt an increase in tuition and fee rates for in-district
students for the academic year that is greater than the tuition
restraint described in this subsection. For the academic year 2025-
2026, 2026-2027, the tuition restraint level is equal to the
greater of 4.5% 4.0% or $227.00. $199.00. For the academic year
2026-2027, 2027-2028, the tuition restraint level is equal to the
greater of 4.0% 3.5% or $199.00. $179.00. It is intended that in
the next fiscal year, the tuition restraint rate will be adjusted
only for the subsequent academic year. As used in this subsection:
(a) "Fee" means any board-authorized fee that will be paid by
more than 1/2 of all in-district students at least once during
their enrollment at a community college. A community college
increasing a fee that applies to a specific subset of students or
courses shall provide sufficient information to prove that the
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


increase applied to that subset will not cause the increase in the
average amount of board-authorized total tuition and fees paid by
in-district students in the academic year to exceed the limit
established in this section.
(b) "Tuition and fee rate" means the average of full-time
rates paid by a majority of students in each class, based on an
unweighted average of the rates authorized by the community college
board and actually charged to students, deducting any uniformly
rebated or refunded amounts, for the 2 semesters with the highest
levels of full-time equated in-district enrollment during the
academic year.
(3) Community colleges that exceed the tuition and fee rate
cap described in subsection (2) are not eligible to receive
payments under section 201f for 1-time performance funding payments
for fiscal year 2025-2026. 2026-2027. The state budget director
shall implement uniform reporting requirements to ensure that a
community college receiving a payment under section 201f for 1-time
performance funding has satisfied the tuition restraint
requirements of this section. The state budget director has the
sole authority to determine if a community college has met the
requirements of this section. Information reported by a community
college to the state budget director under this subsection must
also be reported to the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on community colleges and the house and senate fiscal
agencies.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the
legislature may at any time adjust appropriations for a community
college that adopts an increase in tuition and fee rates for in-
district students that exceeds the rate cap established in
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


subsection (2).
Sec. 217d. (1) By December 31, 2026, each community college
that receives an appropriation under section 201 must produce a
report detailing any increases, decreases, or other substantive
changes to diversity, equity, and inclusion programs made after
January 1, 2026.
(2) If the report described in subsection (1) documents a
change that could reduce access to a diversity, equity, or
inclusion program for that university's students or employees, the
community college shall also report other efforts, programs, or
resources that the community college provides that would serve to
mitigate any negative consequences associated with the documented
program reduction.
Sec. 217e. Not later than December 1 of each year, each
community college that receives an appropriation in section 201
shall provide a report to the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on higher education, the house and senate fiscal
agencies, and the state budget director providing an itemized cost
of attendance for full-time students attending that community
college for the current and previous 2 academic years.
Sec. 217g. (1) Subject to subsection (2), the state treasurer
shall reduce payments made under section 254 for any community
college that is an authorizing body by an amount equal to the
difference between the amount reported in section 217c(1)(m)(i)
during the previous fiscal year and 1% times the total state school
aid received by all public school academies authorized by the
authorizing body during that fiscal year. The state treasurer may
coordinate with the state budget office or any other state
department or agency to administer this section.
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


(2) If the calculation in subsection (1) would result in a net
payment under section 254 that is a negative number, the payment
under section 254 must be $0.00.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Authorizing body" means that term as defined in section
501 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.501.
(b) "Total state school aid" means that term as used in
section 502 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502.
Sec. 223. (1) By January 15 of each year, the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall submit to the
state budget director, the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on community colleges, and the house and senate
fiscal agencies a report on North American Indian tuition waivers
for the preceding academic year that includes, but is not limited
to, all of the following information:
(a) The number of waiver applications received and the number
of waiver applications approved.
(b) For each community college submitting information under
subsection (2), all of the following:
(i) The number of North Native American Indian students
enrolled each term for the previous academic year.
(ii) The number of North American Indian waivers granted each
term, including continuing education students, and the monetary
value of the waivers for granted each term of the previous academic
year.
(iii) The number of North Native American Indian students who
receive a granted waiver for the previous academic year.
(iv) The number of students attending under a North American
Indian tuition waiver who withdrew from the college each term
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


during the previous academic year. For purposes of this
subparagraph, a withdrawal occurs when a student who has been
awarded the waiver withdraws from the institution at any point
during the term, regardless of enrollment in subsequent terms.
(v) The number of students attending under a North American
Indian tuition waiver who successfully transfer to a 4-year public
or private university, or complete a degree or certificate program,
separated by degree or certificate level, and the graduation rate
for students attending under a North American Indian tuition waiver
who complete a degree or certificate within 150% of the normal time
to complete, separated by the level of the degree or certificate.
(2) By January 1 of each year, a community college that
receives an appropriation in section 201 or a tribal institution
that receives funding for the North American Indian tuition waiver
shall provide to the department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential any information necessary for preparing the report
described in subsection (1), using guidelines and procedures
developed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential.
(3) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential may consolidate the report required under this section
with the report required under section 268, but a consolidated
report must separately identify data for universities and data for
community colleges.
Sec. 229a. Included in the fiscal year 2025-2026 2026-2027
appropriations for the department of technology, management, and
budget are appropriations totaling $38,032,600.00 $40,398,900.00 to
provide funding for the state share of costs for previously
constructed capital projects for community colleges. Those
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


appropriations for state building authority rent represent
additional state general fund support for community colleges, and
the following is an estimate of the amount of that support to each
community college:
(a) Alpena Community College, $855,000.00.
(b) Bay de Noc Community College, $515,000.00.
(c) Delta College, $2,881,100.00.$2,881,000.00.
(d) Glen Oaks Community College, $380,000.00.
(e) Gogebic Community College, $56,000.00.
(f) Grand Rapids Community College,
$2,346,000.00.$2,430,000.00.
(g) Henry Ford College, $1,505,000.00.
(h) Jackson College, $2,044,000.00.
(i) Kalamazoo Valley Community College,
$1,942,000.00.$3,404,500.00.
(j) Kellogg Community College, $679,000.00.
(k) Kirtland Community College, $225,000.00.
(l) Lake Michigan College, $966,000.00.
(m) Lansing Community College, $757,000.00.
(n) Macomb Community College, $4,682,200.00.
(o) Mid Michigan Community College, $1,615,000.00.
(p) Monroe County Community College,
$1,540,000.00.$2,359,900.00.
(q) Montcalm Community College, $446,000.00.
(r) C.S. Mott Community College, $3,103,000.00.
(s) Muskegon Community College, $982,000.00.
(t) North Central Michigan College, $646,000.00.
(u) Northwestern Michigan College, $1,787,000.00.
(v) Oakland Community College, $0.00.
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


(w) Schoolcraft College, $2,232,000.00.
(x) Southwestern Michigan College, $822,500.00.
(y) St. Clair County Community College, $718,000.00.
(z) Washtenaw Community College, $1,676,000.00.
(aa) Wayne County Community College, $1,895,800.00.
(bb) West Shore Community College, $736,000.00.
Sec. 230. (1) Subject to subsection (4), money included in the
appropriations for community college operations under section 201
for performance funding and allocated under section 201f for 1-time
performance funding payments is distributed based on the following
formula:
(a) Allocated proportionate to fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026
base appropriations, 30%.
(b) Based on a weighted student contact hour formula as
provided for in the 2016 recommendations of the performance
indicators task force, 30%.
(c) Based on the performance improvement as provided for in
the 2016 recommendations of the performance indicators task force
and based on data provided by the center, 10%.
(d) Based on the performance completion number as provided for
in the 2016 recommendations of the performance indicators task
force, 10%.
(e) Based on the performance completion rate as provided for
in the 2016 recommendations of the performance indicators task
force and based on data provided by the center, 10%.
(f) Based on administrative costs, 5%.
(g) Based on the local strategic value component, as developed
in cooperation with the Michigan Community College Association and
described in subsection (2), 5%.
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


(2) Money included in the appropriations for community college
operations under section 201(2) for local strategic value is
allocated only to each community college that certifies to the
state budget director, through a board of trustees resolution on or
before October 15, 2025, 2026, that the college has met 4 out of 5
best practices listed in each category described in subsection (3).
The resolution must provide specifics as to how the community
college meets each best practice measure within each category. One-
third of funding available under the strategic value component is
allocated to each category described in subsection (3). Amounts
distributed under local strategic value must be on a proportionate
basis to each college's fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 operations
funding. Payments to community colleges that qualify for local
strategic value funding must be distributed with the November
installment payment described in section 206.
(3) For purposes of subsection (2), the following categories
of best practices reflect functional activities of community
colleges that have strategic value to the local communities and
regional economies:
(a) For Category A, economic development and business or
industry partnerships, the following:
(i) The community college has active partnerships with local
employers including hospitals and health care providers.
(ii) The community college provides customized on-site training
for area companies, employees, or both.
(iii) The community college supports entrepreneurship through a
small business assistance center or other training or consulting
activities targeted toward small businesses.
(iv) The community college supports technological advancement
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


through industry partnerships, incubation activities, or operation
of a Michigan technical education center or other advanced
technology center.
(v) The community college has active partnerships with local
or regional workforce and economic development agencies.
(b) For Category B, educational partnerships, the following:
(i) The community college has active partnerships with regional
high schools, intermediate school districts, and career-tech
centers to provide instruction through dual enrollment, concurrent
enrollment, direct credit, middle college, or academy programs.
(ii) The community college hosts, sponsors, or participates in
enrichment programs for area K-12 students, such as college days,
summer or after-school programming, or Science Olympiad.
(iii) The community college provides, supports, or participates
in programming to promote successful transitions to college for
traditional age students, including grant programs such as talent
search, upward bound, or other activities to promote college
readiness in area high schools and community centers.
(iv) The community college provides, supports, or participates
in programming to promote successful transitions to college for new
or reentering adult students, such as adult basic education, a high
school equivalency test preparation program and testing, or
recruiting, advising, or orientation activities specific to adults.
As used in this subparagraph, "high school equivalency test
preparation program" means that term as defined in section 4.
(v) The community college has active partnerships with
regional 4-year colleges and universities to promote successful
transfer, such as articulation, 2+2, or reverse transfer agreements
or operation of a university center.
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


(c) For Category C, community services, the following:
(i) The community college provides continuing education
programming for leisure, wellness, personal enrichment, or
professional development.
(ii) The community college operates or sponsors opportunities
for community members to engage in activities that promote leisure,
wellness, cultural or personal enrichment such as community sports
teams, theater or musical ensembles, or artist guilds.
(iii) The community college operates public facilities to
promote cultural, educational, or personal enrichment for community
members, such as libraries, computer labs, performing arts centers,
museums, art galleries, or television or radio stations.
(iv) The community college operates public facilities to
promote leisure or wellness activities for community members,
including gymnasiums, athletic fields, tennis courts, fitness
centers, hiking or biking trails, or natural areas.
(v) The community college promotes, sponsors, or hosts
community service activities for students, staff, or community
members.
(4) Payments for performance funding under section 201 and for
1-time performance funding payments under section 201f must be made
to a community college only if that community college actively
participates in the Michigan Transfer Network sponsored by the
Michigan Association of Collegiate Registrars and Admissions
Officers and submits timely updates, including updated course
equivalencies at least every 6 months, to the Michigan Transfer
Network. The state budget director shall determine if a community
college has not satisfied this requirement. The state budget
director may withhold payments for performance funding under
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1


section 201 and 1-time performance funding under section 201f until
a community college is in compliance with this subsection.
Enacting section 1. In accordance with section 30 of article
IX of the state constitution of 1963, the total state spending from
state sources for community colleges for fiscal year 2026-2027
under article II of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94,
MCL 388.1801 to 388.1830, as amended by this amendatory act, is
estimated at $490,763,500.00 and the amount of that state spending
from state sources to be paid to local units of government for
fiscal year 2026-2027 is estimated at $490,763,500.00.
Enacting section 2. Section 217f of the state school aid act
of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1817f, is repealed effective October
1, 2026.
Enacting section 3. This amendatory act takes effect October
1, 2026.
Final Page
AIS S06119'26 (S-1) a96jx1